Colorado, session 2026A, HB1086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 30-28-133.1
as follows:
30-28-133.1. Subdivision plan or plat - access to public
highways.
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, no person may submit an application
for subdivision approval to a local authority unless the subdivision plan
or plat provides pursuant to section 43-2-147, C.R.S., that all lots and
parcels created by the subdivision will have access to the state highway
system in conformance with the state highway access code. ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT, AND A LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY
APPROVE, AN APPLICATION FOR A SUBDIVISION PLAN OR PLAT THAT DOES
NOT PROVIDE THAT ALL LOTS AND PARCELS CREATED BY THE SUBDIVISION
WILL HAVE ACCESS TO THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 31-23-214.1
as follows:
31-23-214.1. Subdivision plan or plat - access to public
highways.
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, no person may submit an application
for subdivision approval to a local authority unless the subdivision plan
or plat provides pursuant to section 43-2-147, C.R.S., that all lots and
parcels created by the subdivision will have access to the state highway
system in conformance with the state highway access code. ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT, AND A LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY
-2- HB26-1086

APPROVE, AN APPLICATION FOR A SUBDIVISION PLAN OR PLAT THAT DOES
NOT PROVIDE THAT ALL LOTS AND PARCELS CREATED BY THE SUBDIVISION
WILL HAVE ACCESS TO THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-2-147, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
43-2-147. Access to public highways - definitions.
(1) (b) Vehicular access to or from property adjoining a state
highway shall be provided to the general street system, unless such access
has been acquired by a public authority. Police, fire, ambulance, and other
emergency stations shall have a right of direct access to state highways.
After June 21, 1979, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, no person may
submit an application for subdivision approval to a local authority unless
the subdivision plan or plat provides that all lots and parcels created by
the subdivision will have access to the state highway system in
conformance with the state highway access code. ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT, AND A LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY APPROVE,
AN APPLICATION FOR A SUBDIVISION PLAN OR PLAT THAT DOES NOT
PROVIDE THAT ALL LOTS AND PARCELS CREATED BY THE SUBDIVISION WILL
HAVE ACCESS TO THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-3- HB26-1086

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1086